Hawaii statutes.
§651-17 Discharge by bond of defendant.
If the defendant, at any time before judgment, causes a bond to be executed to
the plaintiff with sufficient sureties, to be approved by the officer having
the attachment, or, after the return thereof, by the clerk, to the effect that
the defendant will perform the judgment of the court, the attachment shall be
discharged and restitution made of the property taken or the proceeds thereof.
The execution of the bond shall be deemed an appearance of the defendant to the
action. The bond shall be part of the record, and if judgment go against the
defendant, the same shall be entered against the defendant and the sureties. [L
1905, c 84, §17; RL 1925, §2821; RL 1935, §4206; RL 1945, §10157; RL 1955,
§233-17; HRS §651-17; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Action on bond. 22 H. 540 (1915).

Cited in determining validity of mortgage made after
attachment. 51 H. 164, 454 P.2d 116 (1969).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next